Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2197
Conveyances; valid against subsequent purchasers and parties to action.

Such conveyances so executed, being recorded in the county where the premises are situated, shall be valid against all subsequent purchasers, and also against all persons interested at the time who were made parties to the proceedings in the mode pointed out by law.

R.S.1867, Code § 830, p. 540;

R.S.1913, § 8313;

C.S.1922, § 9265;

C.S.1929, § 20-2197;

R.S.1943, § 25-2197.

Judgment fixing shares and confirming sale is final where all interested parties are before court; and parties thereto cannot question title of subsequent bona fide purchaser, in absence of fraud on face of proceedings. Federal Land Bank of Omaha v. Tuma, 116 Neb. 99, 216 N.W. 186 (1927).